en: Peach pastes
de: Pfirsichpaste
es: Dulces de melocotón, Pastas de melocotón, Cremas de melocotón
fr: Pâtes de pêches
hr: Paste od breskve
lt: Persikų pasta
nl: Perzikenpastas

en: Plum pastes
de: Pflaumenpaste
es: Dulces de ciruela, Pastas de ciruela, Cremas de ciruela
fr: Pâtes de prunes
hr: Paste od šljiva
lt: Slyvų pasta
nl: Pruimenpastas

en: Quince cheeses
de: Quittenpaste
es: Dulces de membrillo, Carnes de membrillo, Pastas de membrillo, Cremas de membrillo
fr: Pâtes de coings
hr: Sirevi od dunja
lt: Svarainių sūriai
nl: Kweepeerpastas

en: Canned foods, Canned, Cans, Jarred foods
bg: Консерви
ca: Aliments enllaunats
da: Dåsemad, konserves
de: Konserven
es: Conservas, Alimentos en conserva
fi: Purkitetut ruoat
fr: Conserves
he: קופסאות שימורים, מזון משומר, מזון בצנצנת, שימורים
hr: Konzervirana hrana
hu: Konzervek
it: Alimenti in scatola
ja: 缶詰
lt: Konservuoti maisto produktai, Konservacija
nl: Conserven, Blikvoedsel
pl: Konserwy
pt: Comida enlatada
ro: Conserve, conserve mancare
ru: Консервы
th: อาหารกระป๋อง
tr: Konserve gıda, Konserve besin, Konserve yiyecek, Konserve ürünler, Konserve mamüller, Kavanozlu gıda, Kavanozlu besin, Kavanozlu yiyecek
zh: 罐头食品, 罐装食品, 罐頭食品, 醃製品

en: Semi-preserved foods
de: Halbkonserven
es: Semiconservas, Semi-conservas
fr: Semi-conserves
hr: Polukonzervisana hrana
it: Alimenti semiconservati
lt: Pusiau konservuoti maisto produktai
nl: Half geconserveerde producten

en: Fish eggs, Roes
de: Fischeier, Rogen
es: Huevas
fi: kalan mädit
fr: Œufs de poisson
hr: Riblja jaja
it: Uova di pesce
ja: 魚卵
lt: Žuvies ikrai
nl: Visseneieren
zh: 鱼卵, 鱼子

en: Frozen fish eggs, Frozen roes
fr: Œufs de poisson surgelés

en: Bottarga
ca: Botàriga
de: Bottarga
es: Botarga
fr: Boutargue, Poutargue
hr: Bottarga
it: Bottarga
ja: ボッタルガ
nl: Bottarga
pt: Butarga

en: Salmon roe, Semi-preserved salmon roe
fr: Oeufs de saumon, Oeufs de saumon en semi-conserve
hr: Ikra lososa
ja: サケのイクラ
lt: Lašišų ikrai, Pusiau konservuoti lašišų ikrai

en: Smoked cod roe, Semi-preserved smoked cod roe
fr: Oeufs de cabillaud, Oeufs de cabillaud fumés en semi-conserve, Oeufs de cabillaud fumés
hr: Dimljena ikra bakalara
ja: たらこ, タラコ, 鱈子
lt: Menkių ikrai, Pusiau konservuoti menkių ikrai

en: Semi-preserved lump roe
de: Seehasenrogen
fr: Œufs de lump, Œufs de Cyclopterus lumpus, Oeufs de lompe, Œufss de lompe, Oeufs de lompe en semi-conserve
hr: Polukonzervirana grumena ikra

en: Trout roe, Trout eggs, Semi-preserved trout roe
fr: Œufs de truite, Oeufs de truite en semi-conserve

en: Canned raviolis
de: Dosenravioli, Konservenravioli
es: Raviolis enlatados
fi: purkitetut raviolit
fr: Ravioli en conserve, raviolis en conserve, ravioli en boite, raviolis en boite
hr: Konzervirani ravioli
hu: Konzerv ravioli, Ravioli konzervdobozban
it: Ravioli in scatola
lt: Konservuoti ravioliai
nl: Ravioli in blik/pot
ro: Conserve de ravioli

en: Canned meat raviolis in tomato sauce, Canned raviolis filled with meat in tomato sauce
fr: Raviolis à la viande sauce tomate en conserve, Raviolis à la viande en conserve, Raviolis à la viande sauce tomate appertisés

en: Canned vegetable raviolis in tomato sauce, Canned vegetable ravioli, Canned ravioli filled with vegetables in tomato sauce
fr: Raviolis aux légumes sauce tomate en conserve, Raviolis aux légumes en conserve, Raviolis aux légumes sauce tomate appertisés

en: Cheese ravioli in tomato sauce
de: Käseravioli in Tomatensauce
es: Ravioli de queso en salsa de tomate
fr: Ravioli au fromage à la sauce tomate
hr: Ravioli sa sirom u umaku od rajčice
it: Ravioli al formaggio in salsa di pomodoro
nl: Kaasravioli in tomatensaus
ru: Равиоли с сыром в томатном соусе

en: Canned meals, Canned prepared meals, Canned prepared dishes
ca: Aliments en conserva, Aliments preparats en conserva, Plats preparats en conserva
de: Fertiggerichte in Dosen, Dosengerichte
es: Comidas preparadas en conserva, Platos preparados en conserva
fi: purkitetut ateriat
fr: Plats préparés en conserve, plats cuisinés en conserve, plat préparé en conserve
hr: Konzervirana jela
hu: Konzerv ételek
it: Piatti pronti in scatola
lt: Konservuotas paruoštas maistas, Konservuotas maistas
nl: Kant-en-klaarmaaltijden in blik/pot
pl: Dania gotowe w puszkach
pt: Refeições enlatadas
ru: Консервированные блюда
zh: 罐头饭菜

en: Fajitas
xx: Fajitas
es: Fajitas
fr: Fajitas
hr: Fajitas
ja: ファヒータ

en: Stews
de: Eintöpfe, Eintopf
es: Guisos
fi: Pataruoat
fr: Ragoûts
hr: Variva
it: Zuppe e minestre
ja: シチュー
lt: Troškiniai
pl: Potrawki, Gulasze

en: Boiled meat with vegetables
fr: Pot-au-feu